460 . CHAPTER 17
These techniques made possible the production of steel in great quantities and large dimensions, for use in the manufacture of locomotives, steel rails, and girders for the construction of tall buildings.
The steel industry emerged first in western Pennsylvania and eastern Ohio. That was partly because iron ore could be found there in abundance and because there was already a flourishing iron industry in the region. It was also because the new forms of steel production created a demand for new kinds of fuel-particularly a demand for the anthracite (or hard) coal that was plentiful in Pennsylvania. Later, new techniques made it possible to use bituminous (soft) coal (easily mined in western Pennsylvania), which could then be converted to Pittsburgh coke t0 stee^ furnaces. As a result, Pittsburgh quickly became the center of the steel world. But the industry was growing so fast that new sources of ore were soon necessary. The upper peninsula of Michigan, the Mesabi Range in Minnesota, and the area around Birmingham, Alabama, became important ore-producing centers by the end of the century, and new centers of steel production grew up near them in Cleveland, Detroit, Chicago, and
Birmingham, among others.
Until the Civil War, iron and steel furnaces were mostly made of stone and usually built against the side of a hill to
reduce construction demands. In the 1870s and after, however, furnaces were redesigned as cylindrical iron shells lined with brick. These massive new furnaces were 75 feet tall and higher and could produce more than 500 tons of steel a week.
As the steel industry spread, new transportation systems emerged to serve it. The steel production in the Great Lakes region was possible only because of the availability of steam freighters that could carry ore on the lakes, which contributed to development of new and more powerful steam engines. Shippers also used new steam engines to speed the unloading of ore, a task that previously had been performed, slowly and laboriously, by men and horses.
A close relationship grew up between the emerging steel companies and the railroads. Steel manufacturers provided rails and parts for railroad cars. The Pennsylvania Railroad, for example, literally created the Pennsylvania Steel Company, provided it with substantial initial capital, and ensured it a market for its products with an immediate contract for steel rails.
The steel industry's need for lubrication for its machines helped create another important new industry in the late Rise of the nineteenth century-oil. (Not until later did Petroleum	oil become important primarily for its po-
Industry	tential as a fuel.) The existence of petro-
leum reserves in western Pennsylvania had
PIONEER OIL RUN, 1865
The American oil industry emerqed first in western Pennsylvania w/ho™ i <• l -u , . . depicted here had been producing 600 barrels a day, and the wells quickly spilled over the hill and down the slope Town in tWs’oh' t faCll,t'eS ®,"r’ost overnight. An oil field on the other side of the H 1	K	n s Pn°tograph. (The Library of Congress)
INDUSTRIAL SUPREMACY
• 461 been common knowledge for some time. In the 1850s, Pennsylvania businessman George Bissell showed that the substance could be burned in lamps and that it could also yield such products as paraffin, naphtha, and lubricating oil. Bissell raised money to begin drilling; and in 1859, Edwin L. Drake, one of Bissell’s employees, established the first oil well, near Titusville, Pennsylvania, which was soon producing 500 barrels of oil a month. Demand for petroleum grew quickly, and promoters soon developed other fields in Pennsylvania, Ohio, and West Virginia.
The Airplane and the Automobile
Two technologies were critical to the development of the automobile. One was the creation of gasoline (or petrol). It was the result of an extraction process developed in the late nineteenth century in the United States by which lubricating oil and fuel oil were separated from crude oil. In the 1870s, designers in France, Germany, and Austria-inspired by the success of railroad engines-had begun to develop an "internal combustion engine/’ which used the expanding power of burning gas to drive pistons. A German, Nicolaus August Otto,
created a gas-powered engine in the mid-1860s, a precursor to automobile engines. But he did not develop a way to untether it from gas lines to be used portably in machines. One of Otto’s former employees, Gottfried Daimler, later perfected an engine that could be used in automobiles (including the famous early car that took Daimler’s name).
The American automobile industry developed rapidly in the aftermath of these breakthroughs. Charles and Frank Henry Ford Duryea built the first gasoline-driven motor vehicle in America in 1893. Three years later, Henry Ford produced the first of the famous cars that would eventually bear his name. By 1910, the industry had become a major force in the economy and the automobile was beginning to reshape American social and cultural life, as well as the nation’s landscape. In 1895, there were only four automobiles on the American highways. By 1917, there were
nearly 5 million.
The search for a means of human flight was as old as civilization, and had been almost entirely futile until the late nineteenth century, when engineers, scientists, and tinkerers in both the United States and Europe began to experiment with a wide range of aeronautic devices. Balloonists began to


I IM\


................r-S-ffc '•	.• *
THE flight OF THE WRIGHT BROTHERS Orville and Wilbur Wright became great celebrities after their famous flight at Kitty Hawk, North Carolina in	™de few or,9'nal
contributions to the development of aviation technology, but their flight (with Wilbur piloting) helped publicize the -flying machine" that would soon revolutionize travel. !His.oncus, .)
462
CHAPTER 17
consider ways to turn dirigibles into useful vehicles of transportation. Others experimented with kites and gliders to see if they could somehow be used to propel humans through the air.
Among those testing gliders were two brothers in Ohio, Wilbur and Orville Wright, who owned a bicycle shop in which they began to construct a glider that could be propelled through the air by an internal combustion engine (the same kind of engine that was propelling automobiles). In 1903, four years after they began their experiments, Orville made a celebrated test flight near Kitty Hawk, North Carolina, in which an airplane took off by itself and traveled 120 feet in 12 seconds under its own power before settling back to earth. By the fall of 1904, the Wright brothers had improved the plane to the point where they were able to fly over 23 miles, and in the following year they began to take a few passengers with them on their flights.
Although the first working airplane was built in the United States, aviation technology was slow to gain a foothold in America. Most of the early progress in airplane design occurred in France, where there was substantial government funding for research and development. The U.S. government created the National Advisory Committee on Aeronautics in 1915, twelve years after the Wright brothers' flight, and American airplanes became a significant presence in Europe during World War I. But the prospects for commercial flight seemed dim until the 1920s, when Charles Lindbergh’s famous solo flight from New York to Paris electrified the nation and the world and helped make aviation a national obsession.
Research and Development
The rapid development of new industrial technologies encouraged business leaders to sponsor their own research to allow them to keep up with the rapid changes in industry. General Electric, fearful of technological competition, created one of the first corporate laboratories in 1900. By 1913, Bell Telephone, Du Pont, General Electric, Eastman Kodak, and
Corporate about other companies were budget-Research and itig hundreds of thousands of dollars each Development year for research by their own engineers and scientists. The emergence of corporate research and development laboratories coincided with a decline in government support for research. That helped corporations to attract skilled researchers who had once worked for government agencies. It also decentralized the sources of research funding and ensured that inquiry would move in many different directions, not just along paths determined by the
government.
A rift began to emerge between scientists and engineers. Engineers-both inside and out of universities-became increasingly tied up with the research and development agendas of corporations and worked hard to be of practical use to the new economy. Many scientists scorned this "commercialization” of knowledge and preferred to stick to basic research that no immediate practical applications. Even so, American
Transformation scientists were more closely connected of Higher to practical challenges than were their Education European counterparts, and some joined engineers in corporate research and development laboratories, which over time began to sponsor not
just practical but also basic research.
American universities in the late nineteenth and early twentieth centuries developed a growing connection between university-based research and the needs of the industrial economy. University faculty and laboratories began to receive funding from corporations for research, and a partnership began to develop between the academic world and the commercial world that continued into the twenty-first century. No comparable partnership emerged in European universities in these years, and some scholars have argued that America’s more rapid development in the twentieth century is in part a product of the market’s success in harnessing knowledge-from the academic world and elsewhere-more effectively than the nation’s competitors abroad.
The Science of Production
By the beginning of the twentieth century, many industrialists were turning to new principles of "scientific management." Those principles were often known as "Taylorism,” after their leading theoretician, Frederick Winslow Taylor. Taylor’s ideas were controversial during his lifetime and have remained controversial since.
Taylor urged employers to reorganize the production process by subdividing tasks. This would speed up production; it would also make workers more interchangeable and thus di-
"Tayiorism” minish a manager’s dependence on any particular employee. And it would reduce the
N S NOTEBOOK
This page from one of Thomas Edison's notebooks shows so and notes on some of his early experiments on an incandescent lamp—what we i l*1 6 6Ctr,C ^’S^tbulb. Edison was not only the most celebrated inventor of his day but y t early twentieth century, one of the greatest popular heroes in American life in a
On a k- “ ar*d techn°Bgical progress was considered the defining feature of the age (© Archive Photos/Getty Images)
INDUSTRIAL SUPREMACY * 463
INDUSTRIAL PRODUCTION
This postcard conveys the assembly line at the Caterpillar manufacturing company. The factory shown here was enormous, occupying 151 acres, 53.8 of which were enclosed building areas. The men are assembling diesel engines. The company has been well known for building tractors, engines, and road machinery. (© Rykoff Coliection/Corbis) need for highly trained skilled workers. If properly managed by trained experts, Taylor claimed, workers using modern machines could perform simple tasks at much greater speed, significantly increasing productive efficiency. Taylor and his many admirers argued that scientific management was a way to make human labor compatible with the demands of the machine age. Scientific management was also a way to increase the employer’s control of the workplace and to make working people less independent.
The most important change in production technology in the industrial era was the emergence of mass production and, above all, the moving assembly line, which Henry Ford intro-Moving duced in his automobile plants in 1914. Assembly Line This revolutionary technique cut the time for assembling a chassis from 12V2 hours to h/2 hours. It enabled Ford to raise the wages and reduce the hours of his workers while cutting the base price of his Model T from $950 in 1914 to $290 in 1929. Ford’s assembly line
became a model for many other industries.
Railroad Expansion
Despite important advances in many other forms of technology and communication, the principal agent of industrial progress in the late nineteenth century remained the railroad. Railroads were the nation’s principal form of transportation. They helped determine the path by which agricultural and industrial economies developed. When railroad lines ran through sparsely populated regions, new farms and other economic activity quickly sprang up along the routes. When they reached forests, lumberers came quickly in their wake and began cutting down timber to send back to towns and cities for sale. When railroads moved through the great plains of the West, they brought buffalo hunters who nearly exterminated the great herds of bison and, later, helped
transport cattle into the region and carry meat back into the cities. Because Chicago was the principal railroad hub of the central United States, it also became the place where railroads brought livestock, making the city the slaughterhouse of the nation.
Railroads even altered concepts of time. Until the 1880s, there was no standard method of keeping time from one community to another. In most places, the position of the sun determined the time, which meant that clocks were set differently even between nearby towns. This created great difficulties for railroads, which were trying to set schedules for the entire nation. On November 18, 1883, the railroad companies, working together, agreed to create four time zones across the continent, each an hour apart from its closest neighbor. Although not until 1918 did the federal government make these time zones standard for all purposes, the action by the railroads very quickly solidified the idea of "standard time” through most of the United States.
Every decade in the late nineteenth century, total railroad trackage increased dramatically: from 30,000 miles in 1860 to 52,000 miles in 1870, to 93,000 in 1880, to 163,000 in 1890, and to 193,000 by 1900. Subsidies from federal, state, and local governments-as well as investments
from abroad-were vital to these vast undertakings, which required far more capital than private entrepreneurs in America could raise by themselves. Equally important was the emergence of great railroad combinations that brought most of the nation’s rails under the control of a very few men. Many railroad combinations continued to be dominated by individuals. The achievements (and excesses) of these tycoons-Cornelius Vanderbilt, James J. Hill, Collis P. Huntington, and others-became symbols to much of the nation of great economic power concentrated in individual hands. But railroad development was less significant for the individual barons it
Rapid
Expansion of the Railroad
464 * CHAPTER 17
RAILROADS, 1870-1890 This map illustrates the rapid expansion of railroads in the late nineteenth century. In 1870, there was already a dense network of rail lines in the Northeast and Midwest, illustrated here by the green lines. The red lines show the further expansion of rail coverage between 1870 and 1890, much of it in the South and the areas west of the Mississippi River. * Why were railroads so essential to the nation’s economic growth in these years?
created than for its contribution to the growth of a new institution: the modern corporation.
The Corporation
There had been various forms of corporations in America since colonial times, but the modern corporation emerged as a major force only after the Civil War, when railroad magnates and other industrialists realized that no single person or group of limited partners, no matter how wealthy, could finance their great ventures.
Under the laws of incorporation passed in many states in the 1830s and 1840s, business organizations could raise money by Limited selling stock to members of the public; after
Liability the Civil War, one industry after another began doing so. At the same time, affluent
Americans began to consider the purchase of stock a good investment even if they were not involved in the business whose stock they were purchasing. What made the practice appealing was that investors had only "limited liability”-that is, they risked only the amount of their investments; they were not liable for any debts the corporation might accumulate beyond that. The ability to sell stock to a broad public made it possible for entrepreneurs to gather vast sums of capital and undertake great projects.
The Pennsylvania Railroad and others were among the first to adopt the new corporate form of organization. But Andrew	Quickly spread beyond the railroad in-
Carnegie dustry. In steel, the central figure was Andrew Carnegie, a Scottish immigrant who had worked his way up from modest beginnings and in 1873 opened his own steelworks in Pittsburgh. Soon he dominated the industry. His methods were much like those of other industrial titans. He cut costs and prices by striking deals with the railroads and then bought out rivals who could not compete with him. With his associate Henry Clay Frick, he bought up coal mines and leased part of the Mesabi iron-ore range in Minnesota, operated a fleet of ore ships on the Great Lakes, and acquired railroads. Ultimately, Carnegie controlled the processing of his steel from mine to market. He financed his undertakings not only out of his own profits but out of the sale of stock as well. Then, in 1901, he sold out for $450 million to the banker J. Pierpont Morgan, who merged the Carnegie interests with others to create the giant United States Steel Corporation-a $1.4 billion enterprise that controlled almost two-thirds of the nation’s steel
production.
There were similar developments in other industries. Gustavus Swift developed a relatively small Chicago meatpacking
INDUSTRIAL SUPREMACY
• 465 ANDREW CARNEGIE
Carnegie was one of a relatively small number of great industrialists of the late nineteenth century who genuinely rose "from rags to riches.” Born in Scotland, he came to the United States in 1848, at the age of thirteen, and soon found work as a messenger in a Pittsburgh telegraph office. His skill in learning to transcribe telegraphic messages (he became one of the first telegraphers in the country able to take messages by sound) brought him to the attention of a Pennsylvania Railroad official, and before he was twenty, he had begun his ascent to the highest ranks of industry. After the Civil War, he shifted his attention to the growing iron industry; in 1873 he invested all his assets in the development of the first American steel mills. Two decades later Carnegie was one of the wealthiest men in the world. In 1901 he abruptly resigned from his businesses and spent the remaining years of his life as a philanthropist. By the time of his death in 1919, he had given away more than $350 million, which by some measures would be worth well over a hundred billion dollars in 2014. (The Library of Congress (LC-DIG-ggbain-13249)) company into a great national corporation, in part because of profits he earned selling to the military in the Civil War. Isaac Singer patented a sewing machine in 1851 and created I. M. Singer and Company, one of the first modern manufacturing corporations.
Many of the corporate organizations developed a new approach to management. Large, national business enterprises deeded more-systematic administrative structures than the limited, local ventures of the past. As a result, corporate leaders introduced a set of managerial techniques-the genesis of modern business administration-that relied on the division of responsibilities, a carefully designed hierarchy of control, modern cost-accounting procedures, and above all, a new breed of
New	business executive: the "middle manager,”
Managerial who formed a layer of command between Techniques workers and owners. Beginning in the railroad corporations, these new management techniques moved quickly into virtually every area of large-scale industry. Efficient administrative capabilities helped make possible another major feature of the modern corpora-
tion: consolidation.
Consolidating Corporate America
Businessmen created large, consolidated organizations primarily through two methods. One was "horizontal integration”-the
IOHN D. ROCKEFELLER
Rockefeller's Standard Oil Company became perhaps the argest and most powerful monopoly in America in the late nineteenth century, and Rockefeller lecame one of the nation’s wealthiest and most controversial men. Some historians consider Rockefeller to have been the richest person in history with a personal fortune at the time of lis death of up to over a half-trillion dollars adjusted for the late 2000s. (© Hulton Archive/ Setty Images) Horizontal and Vertical Integration
466 CHAPTER 17
combining of a number of firms engaged in the same enterprise into a single corporation. The consolidation of many different railroad lines into one company was an example. Another method, which became popular in the 1890s, was
"vertical integration”-the taking over of all the different businesses on which a company relied for its primary function (as in the case of Carnegie Steel).
The most celebrated corporate empire of the late nineteenth century was John D. Rockefeller’s Standard Oil, a great Rockefeller’s combination created through both hori-Standard Oil zontal and vertical integration. Shortly after the Civil War, Rockefeller launched a refining company in Cleveland and immediately began trying to eliminate his competition. Allying himself with other wealthy capitalists, he proceeded methodically to buy out competing refineries. In 1870, he formed the Standard Oil Company of Ohio; within a few years it had acquired twenty of the twenty-five refineries in Cleveland, as well as plants in Pittsburgh, Philadelphia, New York City, and Baltimore. So far, Rockefeller had expanded only horizontally. But soon he began expanding vertically as well. He built his own barrel factories, terminal warehouses, and pipelines. Standard Oil owned its own freight cars and developed its own marketing organization. By the 1880s, Rockefeller had established such dominance within the petroleum industry that to much of the nation he served as the leading symbol of monopoly. He controlled access to 90 percent of the refined oil in the
United States.
Rockefeller and other industrialists saw consolidation as a way to cope with what they believed was the greatest curse of the modern economy: "cutthroat competition.” Most businessmen claimed to believe in free enterprise and a competitive marketplace, but in fact they feared the existence of too many competing firms, convinced that substantial competition could spell instability and ruin for all. A successful enterprise, many capitalists believed (but did not say publicly), was one that could eliminate or absorb its competitors.
As the movement toward combination accelerated, new vehicles emerged to facilitate it. The railroads began making so-called pool arrangements-informal agreements among various companies to stabilize rates and divide markets (arrangements known as cartels that would later become illegal). But the pools did not work very well. If even a few firms in an industry were unwilling to cooperate (as was almost always the case), the pool arrangements collapsed.
The Trust and the Holding Company
The failure of the pools led to new techniques of consolidation, resting less on cooperation than on centralized control. At first, the most successful such technique was the creation of the "trust’-pioneered by Standard Oil in the early 1880s and perfected by the banker J. P. Morgan. Over time, "trust”
The Trust Agreement
became a term for any great economic combination. But the trust was in fact a particular kind of organization. Under a trust agreement, stockholders in individual corporations transferred their stocks to a small group of trustees in exchange for shares in the trust itself. Owners of trust certificates often had
no direct control over the decisions of the trustees; they simply received a share of the profits of the combination. The trustees themselves, on the other hand, might literally own only a few companies but could exercise effective control over many.
In 1889, the State of New Jersey helped produce a third form of consolidation by changing its laws of incorporation to permit companies to buy up other companies. Other states soon followed. That made the trust unnecessary and permitted actual corporate mergers. Rockefeller, for example, quickly relocated Standard Oil to New Jersey and created there what became known as a "holding company”-a central corporate body that would buy up the stock of various members of the Standard Oil trust and establish direct, formal ownership of the corporations in the trust.
ONT MORGAN
This arresting portrait captures something of the intimidating P°Z7 i P:erp°nt M°r9an'the most P°werful fancier in America for decades until his death in 1913. (© The Granger Collection, New York)
INDUSTRIAL SUPREMACY
• 467 By the end of the nineteenth century, as a result of corporate Rapid consolidation, 1 percent of the corporations
Corporate	America were able to control more than
Consolidation 33 percent of the manufacturing. A system of economic organization was emerging that lodged enormous power in the hands of a very few men: the great bankers of New York such as ). P. Morgan, industrial titans such as Rockefeller (who gained control of a major bank), and others.
Whether or not this relentless concentration of economic power was the only way or the best way to promote industrial expansion became a major source of debate in America. But it is clear that, whatever else they may have done, the industrial giants of the era were responsible for substantial economic growth. They were integrating operations, cutting costs, creating a great industrial infrastructure, stimulating new markets, creating jobs for a vast new pool of unskilled workers, and opening the way to large-scale mass production. They were also creating the basis for some of the greatest public controversies of their era.
CAPITALISM AND ITS CRITICS
The rise of big business produced many critics. Farmers and workers saw in the growth of the new corporate power centers a threat to notions of a republican society in which wealth and authority were widely distributed. Middle-class critics pointed to the corruption that the new industrial titans seemed to produce in their own enterprises and in local, state, and national politics. The growing criticisms challenged the captains of industry to defend the new corporate economy, to convince the public (and themselves) that it was compatible with the ideology of individualism and equal opportunity that had long been central to the American self-image.
The “Self-Made Man"
The most common rationale for modern capitalism rested squarely on the older ideology of individualism. The new industrial economy, its defenders argued, was not reducing opportunities for individual advancement, but expanding them. It was providing every individual with a chance to succeed and attain great wealth.
There was an element of truth in such claims, but only a small one. Before the Civil War there had been Myth of the few millionaires in America; by 1892
Self-Made	there were more than 4,000. Some
Man	were in fact what almost all million-
aires claimed to be: "self-made men.”
Andrew Carnegie had worked as a bobbin boy in a Pittsburgh cotton mill; John D. Rockefeller had begun as a clerk in a Cleveland commission house; E. H. Harriman, a great railroad tycoon, had begun as a broker's office boy. But most of the new business tycoons had begun their careers from positions of wealth and privilege.
Nor was their rise to power and prominence always a result simply of hard work and ingenuity, as they liked to claim. It was also a result of ruthlessness, arrogance, and, at times, rampant corruption. The railroad magnate Cornelius Vanderbilt expressed the attitude of many corporate tycoons with his belligerent question: "What do I care about the law? H’aint I got the power?” So did his son William, with his oft-quoted statement: "The public be damned.” Industrialists made large financial contributions to politicians, political parties, and government officials in exchange for assistance and support. And more often than not, politicians responded as they hoped. Cynics said that
COLOSSUS OF (RAIL) ROADS”
Cornelius Vanderbilt, known as the "Commodore,” accumulated one of America's great fortunes by consolidating several large railroad companies under his control in the 1860s. His name became a synonym not only for enormous wealth, but also (in the eyes of many Americans) for excessive corporate power-as suggested in this cartoon, showing him standing astride his empire and manipulating its parts. (The Library of Congress (LC-DIG-ds-05068)) CONSIDER THE SOURCE
liHHIIHilllllllHIIllIltlllllHIllIlHHillllHlHiilllfiiilll
PHILANTHROPY
THE WORD PHILANTHROPY ORIGINALLY
meant love of humanity or goodwill toward fellow humans, but over time the term has come to mean large-scale giving by wealthy individuals. Steel magnate Andrew Carnegie accumulated a huge fortune in industry but devoted the last two decades of his life to philanthropy, establishing more than 2,500 libraries in the United States, endowing universities, and building Carnegie Hall in New York City and the Peace Palace in The Hague. In 1911, he established the Carnegie Corporation of New York "to promote the advancement and diffusion of knowledge and understanding/' Carnegie articulated his philosophy of the obligation of the wealthy to use their fortunes to improve the world in the essay "Wealth,” published in North American Review in 1889 and excerpted in the first source document below. Investor and philanthropist Warren Buffett is the chairman and chief executive officer of Berkshire Hathaway, a conglomerate holding company whose assets include GEICO, The Pampered Chef, Fruit of the Loom, See's Candies, and Benjamin Moore & Co., among many others. Known as the "Sage of Omaha," Buffett was born in Omaha, Nebraska, in 1930 and still resides in the house he bought there in 1957 for $31,500. He made his first stock purchase at age 11 when he bought shares of Cities Service Preferred. Today Buffett is one of the world's richest men, with an estimated net worth of $45 billion in 2010. In 2006, Buffett announced that he intended to give away most of his fortune during his lifetime, rather than having the funds distributed after his death. The majority of Buffett's wealth will go to the Bill and Melinda Gates Foundation, the charitable foundation established by his close friend, bridge partner, and fellow philanthropist Bill Gates.
ANDREW CARNEGIE-1889
Wealth
Andrew Carnegie
This, then, is held to be the duty of the man of wealth: first, to set an example of modest, unostentatious living, shunning display or extravagance; to provide moderately for the legitimate wants of those dependent upon him; and after doing so to consider all surplus revenues which come to him simply as trust funds which he is called upon to administer, and strictly bound as a matter of duty to administer in the manner which, in his judgment, is best calculated to produce the most beneficial results for the community-the man of wealth thus becoming the mere agent and trustee for his poorer brethren, bringing to their service his superior wisdom, experience, and ability to administer, doing for them better than they would or could do for themselves. . . .
In bestowing charity, the main consideration should be to help those who will help themselves; to provide part of the means by which those who desire to improve may do so; to give those who desire to rise the aids by which they may rise; to assist, but rarely or never to do all. Neither the individual nor the race is improved by almsgiving Those worthy of assistance, except in rare cases, seldom require assistance. The really valuable men of the race never do except in cases of accident or sudden change. Everyone has, of course, cases of individuals brought to his own knowledge where temporary assistance can do genuine good, and these he will not overlook. But the amount which can be wisely given by the

468
individual for individuals is necessarily limited by his lack of knowledge of the circumstances connected with each. He is the only true reformer who is as careful and as anxious not to aid the unworthy as he is to aid the worthy, and, perhaps, even more so, for in almsgiving more injury is probably done by rewarding vice than by relieving virtue.
Thus is the problem of rich and poor to be solved. The laws of accumulation will be left free; the laws of distribution free. Individualism will continue, but the millionaire will be but a trustee for the poor; entrusted for a season with a great part of the increased wealth of the community, but administering it for the community far better than it could or would have done for itself. The best minds will thus have reached a stage in the development of the race in which it is clearly seen that there is no mode of disposing of surplus wealth creditable to thoughtful and earnest men into whose hands it flows save by using it year by year for the general good.
This day already dawns. But a little while, and although, without incurring the pity of their fellows, men may die sharers in great business enterprises from which their capital cannot be or has not been withdrawn, and is left chiefly at death for public uses, yet the man who dies leaving behind him millions of available wealth, which was his to administer during life, will pass away "unwept, unhonored, and unsung,” no matter to what uses he leaves the dross which he cannot take with him. Of such as these the public verdict will then be: "The man who dies thus rich dies disgraced.”
Such, in my opinion, is the true gospel concerning wealth, obedience to which is destined some day to solve the problem of the rich and the poor, and to bring "Peace on earth, among men goodwill.”
Source: North American Review (June 1889). Reprinted in The Annals of America, vol. 11, 1884-1894 (Chicago: Encyclopaedia Britannica, 1968), 222-226.
UNDERSTAND, ANALYZE, AND EVALUATE
1.	What does Carnegie say is the duty and responsibility of the wealthy?
2.	What, according to Carnegie, is the responsibility of those who receive charity from the wealthy? How does Carnegie differentiate between almsgiving and philanthropy?
WARREN BUFFETT-2010
My Philanthropic Pledge
Warren Buffett
In 2006,1 made a commitment to gradually give all of my Berkshire Hathaway stock to philanthropic foundations. I couldn’t be happier with that decision.
Now, Bill and Melinda Gates and 1 are asking hundreds of rich Americans to pledge at least 50% of their wealth to charity. So I think it is fitting that I reiterate my intentions and explain the thinking that lies behind them.
First, my pledge: More than 99% of my wealth will go to philanthropy during my lifetime or at death. Measured by dollars, this commitment is large. In a comparative sense, though, many individuals give more to others every day.
Millions of people who regularly contribute to churches, schools, and other organizations thereby relinquish the use of funds that would otherwise benefit their own families. The dollars these people drop into a collection plate or give to United Way mean forgone movies, dinners out, or other personal pleasures. In contrast, my family and I will give up noth-ing we need or want by fulfilling this 99% pledge.
Moreover, this pledge does not leave me contributing the most precious asset, which is time. Many people, including -I’m proud to say-my three children, give extensively of their own time and talents to help others. Gifts of this kind often prove far more valuable than money. A struggling child, befriended and nurtured by a caring mentor, receives a gi t whose value far exceeds what can be bestowed by a check. My sister, Doris, extends significant person-to-person help daily. I’ve done little of this.
What I can do, however, is to take a pile of Berkshire Hathaway stock certificates-wclaim checks'’ that when converted to cash can command far-ranging resources-and commit them to benefit others who, through the luck of the draw, have received the short straws in life. To date about 20% of my shares have been distributed (including shares given me by my late wife, Susan Buffett). I will continue to annually distribute about 4% of the shares I retain. At the latest, the proceeds from all of my Berkshire shares will be expended for philanthropic purposes by 10 years after my estate is settled. Nothing will go to endowments; I want the money spent on current needs.
This pledge will leave my lifestyle untouched and that of my children as well. They have already received significant sums for their personal use and will receive more in the future. They live comfortable and productive lives. And I will continue to live in a manner that gives me everything I could possibly want in life.
Some material things make my life more enjoyable; many, however, would not. I like having an expensive private plane, but owning a half-dozen homes would be a burden. Too often, a vast collection of possessions ends up possessing its owner. The asset I most value, aside from health, is interesting, diverse, and long-standing friends.
My wealth has come from a combination of living in America, some lucky genes, and compound interest. Both my children and I won what I call the ovarian lottery. (For starters, the odds against my 1930 birth taking place in the U.S. were at least 30 to 1. My being male and white also removed huge obstacles that a majority of Americans then faced.)
My luck was accentuated by my living in a market system that sometimes produces distorted results, though overall it serves our country well. I’ve worked in an economy that rewards someone who saves the lives of others on a battlefield with a medal, rewards a great teacher with thank-you notes from parents, but rewards those who can detect the mispricing of securities with sums reaching into the billions. In short, fate’s distribution of long straws is wildly capricious.
The reaction of my family and me to our extraordinary good fortune is not guilt, but rather gratitude. Were we to use more than 1% of my claim checks on ourselves, neither our happiness nor our well-being would be enhanced. In contrast, the remaining 99% can have a huge effect on the health and welfare of others. That reality sets an obvious course for me and my family: Keep all we can conceivably need and distribute the rest to society, for its needs. My pledge starts us down that course.
Warren Buffett
("My Philanthropic Pledge,” by Warren Buffet. This material is copyrighted and used with permission of the author.)
MAKE CONNECTIONS
1.	Does it appear that, according to his philanthropic pledge, Warren Buffett is a believer in Carnegie's "gospel of wealth"?
2.	What similarities are there between Buffett's beliefs concerning wealth and personal fortune and Carnegie’s? Do you see any significant differences between the two men's views on the responsibilities of the wealthy?
3.	Do you think Carnegie would say that Warren Buffett, according to his philanthropic pledge, fulfills the "duty of the man of wealth?
70
INDUSTRIAL SUPREMACY - 471
Standard Oil did everything to the Ohio legislature except refine it A member of the Pennsylvania legislature once reportedly said: "Mr. Speaker, I move we adjourn unless the Pennsylvania Railroad has more business for us to transact.”
The average industrialist of the late nineteenth century was not, however, a Rockefeller or a Vanderbilt. For every successful millionaire, there were dozens of aspiring businessmen whose efforts failed. Some industries fell under the monopolistic control of a single firm or a small group of large firms. But most industries remained fragmented, with many small companies struggling to carve out a stable position for themselves in an uncertain, highly competitive environment. The annals of business did indeed include real stories of individuals rising from rags to riches. They also included stories of people moving from riches back to rags.
Survival of the Fittest
Most tycoons liked to claim that they had attained their wealth and power through hard work, acquisitiveness, and thrift-the traditional virtues of Protestant America. Those who succeeded, they argued, deserved their success. "God gave me my money,” explained John D. Rockefeller, expressing the assumption that riches were a reward for worthiness. Those who failed, they said, had earned their failure-through their own laziness, stupidity, or carelessness. "Let us remember,” said a prominent Protestant minister, "that there is not a poor person in the United States who was not made poor by his own shortcomings.”
Such assumptions helped strengthen a popular social theory of the late nineteenth century: Social Darwinism, the appli-Social	cation of Charles Darwin's laws of evolution
Darwinism and natural selection among species to human society. Just as only the fittest survived in the process of evolution, Social Darwinists claimed, so in human society only the fittest individuals survived and
flourished in the marketplace.
The English philosopher Herbert Spencer was the first and most important proponent of this theory. Society, he argued, benefited from the elimination of the unfit and the survival of the strong and talented. Spencer’s books were popular in America in the 1870s and 1880s. And his teachings found prominent supporters among American intellectuals, most notably William Graham Sumner of Yale University who promoted similar ideas in lectures, articles, and a famous 1906 book, Folkways. Sumner did not agree with everything Spencer wrote, but he did share Spencer’s belief that individuals must have absolute freedom to struggle, to compete, to succeed, or to fail. Many industrialists seized on the theories of Spencer and Sumner to justify their own power. "The growth of a large business is merely the survival of the fittest,” Rockefeller proclaimed. "This is not an evil tendency in business. It is merely the working out of the law of nature and a law of God.”
Social Darwinism appealed to businessmen because it seemed to legitimize their success and confirm their virtues. It also appealed to them because it placed their activities within
the context of traditional American ideas of freedom and indi-Justifying the vidualism. Above all, it appealed to them
Status Quo because it justified their tactics. Social Darwinists insisted that all attempts by labor to raise wages by forming unions and all endeavors by government to regulate economic activities would fail, because economic life was controlled by a natural law, the law of competition. And Social Darwinism coincided with another "law” that seemed to justify business practices and business dominance: the law of supply and demand as defined by Adam Smith and the classical economists. The economic system, they argued, was like a great and delicate machine functioning
by the "invisible hand” of market forces.
But Social Darwinism and the ideas of classical economics did not have much to do with the realities of the corporate economy. At the same time that businessmen were celebrating the virtues of competition and the free market, they were actively seeking to protect themselves from competition and to replace the natural workings of the marketplace with control by great combinations. Rockefeller’s great Standard Oil monopoly was the clearest example of the effort to free an enterprise from competition. Many other businessmen made similar attempts on a smaller scale. Vicious competitive battle-something Spencer and Sumner celebrated and called a source of healthy progress-was in fact the very thing that American businessmen most feared and tried to eliminate.
The Gospel of Wealth
Some businessmen attempted to temper the harsh philosophy of Social Darwinism with a more gentle, if in some ways equally self-serving, idea: the "gospel of wealth.” People of great wealth, advocates of this idea argued, had not only great power but great responsibilities as well. It was their duty to use their riches to advance social progress. Andrew Carnegie elaborated on the creed in his 1901 book, The Gospel of Wealth, in which he wrote that the wealthy should consider all revenues in excess of their own needs as "trust funds” to be used for the good of the community; the person of wealth, he said, was "the mere trustee and agent for his poorer brethren.” Carnegie was only one of many great industrialists who devoted large parts of their fortunes to philanthropic works-much of it to libraries and schools, institutions he believed would help the poor to help themselves.
The notion of private wealth as a public blessing existed alongside another popular concept: the notion of great wealth Russell as something available to all. Russell H.
Conwell Conwell, a Baptist minister, became the most prominent spokesman for the idea by delivering one lecture, "Acres of Diamonds,” reportedly more than 6,000 times between 1880 and 1900. Conwell told a series of stories, which he claimed were true, of individuals who had found opportunities for extraordinary wealth in their own backyards. (One such story involved a modest farmer who discovered a vast diamond mine in his own fields in the course of
PATTERNS OF POPULAR CULTURE
ujfWUHinHmhnifjniiJuiifiiiiHinijiMiHiniiiHiuHitHiihuiiii
The Novels of Horatio Alger
> young boy, perhaps an orphan, makes his perilous way through life on the rough streets of the city by selling newspapers or peddling matches. One day, his energy and determination catch the eye of a wealthy man, who gives him a chance to improve himself. Through honesty, charm, hard work, and aggressiveness, the boy rises in the world to become a successful man.
That, in a nutshell, is the story that Horatio Alger presented to his readers in novel after novel-more than 100 of them in all—for over forty years. During Alger’s lifetime, Americans bought many million copies of his novels. After his death in 1899, his books (and others written in his name) continued to sell at an astonishing rate.
Alger was born in 1832 into a middle-class New England family, attended Harvard, and spent a short time as a Unitarian minister. He never experienced the hardships he later chronicled. In the mid-1850s, he turned to writing stories and books. His most famous novel, Ragged Dick, was published in 1868; but there were many others almost identical to it: Tom, the Bootblack; Sink or Swim; Jed, the Poorhouse Boy; Phil, the Fiddler; Andy Grant's Pluck. Most of his books were aimed at young people, and almost all of them were fables of a young man's rise "from rags to riches." The purpose of his writing, he claimed, was twofold. He wanted to "exert a salutary influence upon the class of whom [I] was writing, by setting before them inspiring examples of what energy, ambition, and an honest purpose may achieve." He also wanted to show his largely middle-class readers "the life and experiences of the friendless and vagrant children to be found in all our cities.”
Most Americans of the late nineteenth and early twentieth centuries were attracted to Alger because his stories helped reinforce one of the most cherished of their national myths: that with
willpower and hard work, anyone could become a "self-made man." That belief was all the more important in the late nineteenth century, when the rise of large-scale corporate industrialization was making it increasingly difficult for individuals to control their own fates.
Alger placed great emphasis on the moral qualities of his heroes; their success was a reward for their virtue. But many of his readers ignored the moral message and clung simply to the image of sudden and dramatic success. After the author's death, his publishers responded to that yearning by abridging many of Alger's works to eliminate the parts of his stories where the heroes do good deeds. Instead, they focused solely on the success of Alger's heroes in rising in the world.
Alger had very mixed feelings about the new industrial order he described. His books were meant to reveal not just the opportunities for advancement it sometimes created, but also its cruelty. To Alger, the modern age
working his land.) ”1 say to you/’ he told his rapt audiences, ’That you have ’acres of diamonds’ beneath you right here . . . that the men and women sitting here have within their reach opportunities to get largely wealthy. ... I say that you ought to get rich, and that it is your duty to get rich.” Most of the millionaires in the country, Conwell claimed (inaccurately), had begun on the lowest rung of the economic ladder and had worked their way to success. Every industrious individual had the chance to do likewise.
Horatio Alger was the most famous promoter of the success
Horatio story. (See ’’Patterns of Popular Culture,” pp. Alger	472-473.) Alger was originally a minister in
a small town in Massachusetts but was driven from his pulpit as a result of a sexual scandal. He moved to New York, where he wrote his celebrated novels about poor boys who rise ’’from rags to riches”-more than 100 in all, which together sold more than 20 million copies. He became something of a folk hero in American culture. Few of his many fans were aware of his homosexuality. Like most other gay men of his era, he kept his private life carefully hidden, fearful that
publicity would destroy his reputation and his career.
Alternative Visions
Alongside the celebrations of competition, the justifications for great wealth, and the legitimization of the existing order
stood a group of alternative philosophies, challenging the corporate ethos and at times capitalism itself.
One such philosophy emerged in the work of the sociologist Lester Frank Ward. Ward was a Darwinist, but he rejected Lester Frank	application of Darwinian laws to hu-
Ward	man society. In Dynamic Sociology (1883)
and other books, he argued that civilization was governed not by natural selection but by human intelligence, which was capable of shaping society as it wished. Unlike Sumner, who believed that state intervention to remodel the environment was futile, Ward thought that an active government engaged in positive planning was society’s best hope. The people, through their government, could inter-
vene in the economy and adjust it to serve their needs.
Other Americans skeptical of the laissez-faire ideas of the Social Darwinists adopted drastic approaches to reform. Some dissenters joined the Socialist Labor Party, founded in the 1870s and led for many years by Daniel De Leon, an immigrant from the West Indies. De Leon attracted a modest following in the industrial cities, but the party failed to become a major political force. It never polled more than 82,000 votes. A dissident faction of his party, eager to forge ties with organized labor, broke away and in 1901 formed the more enduring American Socialist Party.
Other radicals gained a wider following. One of the most influential was Henry George of California. His angrily eloquent
472
RISEN FROM THE RANKS
Alger s novels were even more popular after his death in 1899 than they had been in his lifetime, This is a reprint of the cover of one of his many "rags-to-riches" books. Risen from the Ranks is about the rise of a young boy, Harry Walton, who rises from newsboy to newspaper editor. {© The Granger Collection, New York) did not guarantee success through hard work alone; there had to be some providential assistance as well. That was one reason that in almost all his books, his heroes triumphed not just because of their own virtues or efforts, but because of some amazing stroke of luck as well. Over time Alger's admirers came to ignore his own misgivings about industrialism and to portray his books purely as celebrations of (and justifications for) laissez-faire capitalism and the accumulation of wealth.
Today, though his books are largely forgotten, the name Horatio Alger lives on, representing the idea of individual advancement through (in a phrase Alger coined) "pluck and luck." An example of the transformation of Alger into a symbol of individual achievement is the Horatio Alger Award, established in 1947 by the American Schools and Colleges Association to honor "living individuals who by their own efforts had pulled themselves up by their bootstraps in the American tradition." Among its recipients have been Presidents Dwight D. Eisenhower and Ronald Reagan, evangelist Billy Graham, and U.S. Supreme Court Justice Clarence Thomas. •
UNDERSTAND, ANALYZE, AND EVALUATE
1.	How do Alger's novels both defend industrial capitalism and criticize it?
2.	According to the essay, Alger placed great emphasis on the moral qualities of his heroes, but his publishers later eliminated that aspect of the novels. Why?
3.	Do Alger's themes—"rags to riches," success as a reward for virtue, "pluck and luck"—live on in contemporary popular culture? If so, cite some examples where you find these themes portrayed.
Progress and Poverty, published in 1879, became one of the best-selling nonfiction works in American publishing history. Henry George Geor^e tried t0 explain why poverty existed amid the wealth created by modern industry. "This association of poverty with progress is the great enigma of our times/’ he wrote. nSo long as all the increased wealth which modern progress brings goes but to build up great fortunes, to increase luxury and make sharper the contrast between the House of Have and the House of Want,
progress is not real and cannot be permanent.”
George blamed social problems on the ability of a few monopolists to grow wealthy as a result of rising land values. An increase in the value of land, he claimed, was a result not of any effort by the owner, but of the growth of society around the land. It was an "unearned increment,” and it was rightfully the property of the community. And so George proposed a "single tax,” to replace all other taxes, which would return the increment to the people. The tax, he argued, would destroy monopolies, distribute wealth more equally, and eliminate poverty. Single-tax societies sprang up in many cities. George moved east to New York; and in 1886, with the support of labor and the socialists, he narrowly missed being elected mayor.
Rivaling George in popularity was Edward Bellamy, whose utopian novel Looking Backward, published in 1888, sold more than 1 million copies. It described the experiences of a young Bostonian who went into a hypnotic sleep in 1887 and awoke
Looking in t^ie Year 2000 t0 ^nd a new social order Backward where want, politics, and vice were unknown. The new society had emerged from a peaceful, evolutionary process. The large trusts of the late nineteenth century had continued to grow and combine until they formed a single great trust, controlled by the government, which absorbed all the businesses of all the citizens and distributed the abundance of the industrial economy equally among all the people. Society had become a great machine, "so logical in its principles and direct and simple in its workings” that it almost ran itself. "Fraternal cooperation” had replaced competition. Class divisions had disappeared. Bellamy labeled the philosophy behind this vision "nationalism,” and his work inspired the formation of more than 160 Nationalist Clubs to
propagate his ideas.
The Problems of Monopoly
Relatively few Americans shared the views of those who questioned capitalism itself. But by the end of the century a growing number of people were becoming deeply concerned about a particular, glaring aspect of capitalism: the growth of monopoly (control of the market by large corporate combinations). Laborers, farmers, consumers, small manufacturers, conservative bankers and financiers, advocates of radical change-all began to assail monopoly and economic concentration.
• 473


The Novels of Louisa May Alcott
Horatio Alger's rags-to-riches tales captured the aspirations of many men of the late nineteenth century, Louisa May Alcott's enormously popular novels helped give voice to the often-unstated
ambitions of many young women.
Alcott was born in 1832, the daughter of a prominent if generally impoverished reformer and educator, Bronson Alcott—a New England transcendentalist committed to abolishing slavery and advancing women's rights. Louisa May Alcott grew up wanting to write, one of the few serious vocations available to women. As a young adult, she wrote a series of popular adventure novels under the pen name A. M. Barnard, populated by conventional male heroes. While serving as a nurse in the Civil War, she contracted typhoid and recovered, but developed mercury poisoning through her treatment and suffered from it until her death in 1888. After the war, she chose a different path—writing realistic fiction and basing it on the lives and experiences of women. The publication of Little Women (1868,1869) established Alcott as a major literary figure and as an enduring, if sometimes puzzling, inspiration for girls and, indeed, women of all ages.
Little Women—and its successors Little Men (1871) and Jo's Boys (1886)—were unlike the formulaic Horatio Alger stories, in which young men inevitably rose from humble circumstances to great success. And yet they both echoed and altered the message of those books. The fictional March
family in the novels was in fact modeled on Alcott’s own impoverished if intellectually lively childhood, and much of Little Women is a chronicle of poverty, suffering, and even death. But it is also the story of a young girl—Jo March, modeled to some degree on Alcott herself—who struggles to build a life for herself that is not defined by conventional women's roles and ambitions. Jo March, like Louisa May Alcott, becomes a writer. She spurns a conventional marriage (to her attractive and wealthy neighbor Laurie). Unlike Alcott, who never married, Jo does find a husband—an older man, a German professor who does not support Jo's literary ambitions,
Many readers have found this marriage troubling— and false to the message of the rest of the book, It seems to contradict Alcott's belief that women can have intellectual independence and achievement. But to Alcott,
CHILDREN OF WEALTH
Amy Elizabeth du Pont (1880-1962), the heiress of the American industrialist du Pont family drives h photograph, taken by Pierre A. Gentieu, shows the children enjoying themselves while traveling with their family in France (© Ha |e iT y°Un9er S'Ster' Jul'a'lheir own Pon),'<lr'ven bo99Y The
in rance. (© Hagley Museum & Library, Wilmington, Delaware, USA/The Bridgeman Art Library)

(© Bettmann/Corbis)
this unconventional marriage was a symbol of her own repudiation of an ordinary domestic life. Girls write to ask who the little women marry, as if that was the only end and aim of a womans life," Alcott wrote a friend after the publication of the first volume of the novel. "I wont marry Jo to Laurie to please any one." Jos marriage to Professor Bhaer is in many ways a concession. "Jo should have remained a literary spinster [like Alcott herself]," she once wrote, "but so many enthusiastic ladies wrote to me clamorously demanding that she should marry Laurie, or somebody, that I didn't dare to refuse and out of perversity went and made a funny match for her.”
It is tempting to see Louisa May Alcott's life —as an independent woman, a writer, and an active suffragist—as a better model to her
readers than the characters in her fiction. Jo March is willful, rebellious, stubborn, ambitious,
and often selfish, not the poised, romantic, submissive woman of most sentimental novels of her time. She hates housekeeping and drudgery. She yearns at times to be a boy. She resists society's expec-tations—through her literary aspirations, her sharp temper, and ultimately her unconventional marriage. Through those qualities, she captured the imaginations of late-nineteenth-century female
readers and continues to capture the imaginations of readers today. Little Women has survived far longer than the Horatio Alger stories did precisely because it presents a story of growing up that, unlike Alger's, is not predictable but complicated, conflicted, and surprising. •
UNDERSTAND, ANALYZE, AND EVALUATE
1.	Do the female characters of Alcott's novels reflect the actual status of women in the late nineteenth century?
2.	In what ways are Alcott's novels similar to Alger's? How do they differ?
3.	Little Women has continued to be popular as a novel, and it has been made several times into movies and at least once into a Broadway musical. What accounts for its enduring popularity?
They blamed monopoly for creating artificially high prices and for producing a highly unstable economy. In the absence of competition, they argued, monopolistic industries could charge whatever prices they wished; railroads, in particular, charged very high rates along some routes because, in the absence of competition, they knew their customers had no choice but to pay them. Artificially high prices, moreover, contributed to the economy’s instability, as production consistently outpaced demand. Beginning in 1873, the economy fluctuated erratically, with severe recessions creating havoc every five or six years, each recession worse than the previous one, until finally, in 1893, the system seemed on the verge of total collapse.
Hostility to monopoly was based on more than a concern about prices. Many Americans considered monopoly dangerous because the rise of large combinations seemed to threaten the ability of individuals to advance in the world. If a single person, or a small group, could control all economic activity in an industry, what opportunities would be left for others? To men, in particular, monopoly threatened the ideal of the wage-earning husband capable of supporting a family and prospering, because combinations seemed to reduce opportunities to succeed-to make less likely the idea of the "self-made man” Memorialized in the novels of Horatio Alger. Monopoly, therefore, threatened not just competition, but certain notions of Manhood as well.
Adding to the resentment of monopoly was the emer-gence of a new class of enormously and conspicuously wealthy people, whose lifestyles became an affront to those Juggling to stay afloat. According to one estimate early in
the century, 1 percent of the families in America controlled nearly 88 percent of the nation’s assets. Some of the wealthy-Andrew Carnegie, for example-lived unostentatiously and donated large sums to charities. Others, however, lived in almost grotesque luxury. Like a clan of feudal barons, the Vanderbilts maintained, in addition to many country estates, seven opulent mansions on seven blocks of New York City’s Fifth Avenue. Other wealthy New Yorkers lavished vast sums on parties. The most notorious, a ball on which Mrs. Bradley Martin spent $368,000, created such a furor that she and her husband fled to England to escape public abuse.
Observing their flagrant displays of wealth were the four-fifths of the American people who lived modestly and at least
Increasing 10 mibi°n Pe°ple who lived below the
Inequality commonly accepted poverty line. The standard of living was rising for everyone, but the gap between rich and poor was increasing. To those in difficult economic circumstances, the sense of relative deprivation could be almost as frustrating and embittering as
poverty itself.
INDUSTRIAL WORKERS
IN THE NEW ECONOMY
The American working class was both a beneficiary and a victim of the growth of industrial capitalism. Many workers in the late nineteenth century experienced a real rise in their standard of living. But they did so at the cost of arduous and
475
476
CHAPTER 17
often dangerous working conditions, diminishing control over their own work, and a growing sense of powerlessness.
The Immigrant Workforce
The industrial workforce expanded dramatically in the late nineteenth century as demand for factory labor grew. There was a continuing flow of rural Americans into factory towns and cities-people disillusioned with or bankrupted by life on the farm and eager for new economic and social opportunities. And there was a great wave of immigration from Mexico, Asia, Canada, and above all Europe in the decades following the Civil War-an influx greater than that of any previous era. The 25 million immigrants who arrived in the United States between 1865 and 1915 were more than four times the number who had arrived in the fifty years before.
In the 1870s and 1880s, most of the immigrants to eastern industrial cities came from the nation's traditional sources: New Sources of En8land> Ireland, and northern Europe.
Immigration By the end of the century, however, the major sources of immigration had shifted, with large numbers of southern and eastern Europeans (Italians, Poles, Russians, Greeks, Slavs, and others) moving to America (among other nations) and into the industrial workforce. In the





*


APPROACHING SHORE
This image of European immigrants aboard a ship approaching the American shore captures both the excitement and the tension of these newcomers to the United States. (The Library of Congress (LC-USZ62-7307)) West, the major sources of immigration were Mexico and, until the Chinese Exclusion Act of 1882, Asia. No reliable figures are available for either group, but an estimated 1 million Mexicans entered the United States in the first three decades of the twentieth century, many of them swelling the industrial workforce of western cities.
The new immigrants were coming to America in part to escape poverty and oppression in their homelands. But they were also lured to the United States by expectations of new opportunities. Sometimes such expectations were realistic, but often they were the result of false promises. Railroads tried to lure immigrants into their western landholdings by distributing misleading advertisements overseas. Industrial employers actively recruited immigrant workers under the Contract Labor Law, which-until its repeal in 1885-permitted them to pay for the passage of workers in advance and deduct the amount later from their wages. Even after the repeal of the law, employers continued to encourage the immigration of unskilled laborers, often with the assistance of foreign-born labor brokers, such as the Greek and Italian padrones, who recruited work gangs of their fellow nationals.
The arrival of these new groups introduced heightened eth-
Heightened nic tensions into the dynamic of the Ethnic Tensions working class. Low-paid Poles, Greeks, and French Canadians began to displace higher-paid British and Irish workers in the textile factories of New England. Italians, Slavs, and Poles emerged as a major source of labor for the mining industry in the East, traditionally dominated by native workers or northern European immigrants. Chinese and Mexicans competed with Anglo-Americans and African Americans in mining, farmwork, and factory labor
in California, Colorado, and Texas.
Wages and Working Conditions
The average standard of living for workers rose in the years after the Civil War, but for many laborers, the return for their labor remained very small. At the turn of the century, the average income of the American worker was $400 to $500 a year—below the $600 figure widely considered the minimum for a reasonable level of comfort. Nor did workers have much job security. All workers were vulnerable to the boom-and-bust cycle of the industrial economy, and some lost their jobs because of technological advances or because of the cyclical or seasonal nature of their work. Even those who kept their jobs could find their wages suddenly and substantially cut in hard times. Few workers, in other words, were ever far from poverty.
American laborers faced other hardships as well. For first-generation workers accustomed to the patterns of agrarian life, there was a difficult
INDUSTRIAL SUPREMACY - 477
WOMEN ON THE ASSEMBLY LINE
This image, from 1902, shows women at work on the lock and drill department assembly line at the National Cash Register Company in Dayton, Ohio. The photograph suggests the growing scale of factory enterprise at the turn of the twentieth century. (© Everett Collection Historical/Alamy) adjustment to the nature of modern industrial labor: the performance of routine, repetitive tasks, often requiring little skill, on a strict and monotonous schedule. To skilled artisans whose once-valued tasks were now performed by machines, the new system was impersonal and demeaning. Factory laborers worked ten- to twelve-hour days, six days a week; in the steel industry they worked twelve hours a day. Many worked in appallingly unsafe or unhealthy factories. Industrial accidents were frequent and severe. Compensation to the victims, from either their employers or the government, was often limited, until many states began passing workmen's compensation laws in the early twentieth century.
For many workers, the most disturbing aspect of factory labor in the new industrial system was their loss of control
Loss of Control over conc^itions °f rheir lab°r- Even semiskilled workers and common laborers had managed to maintain some control over their labor in the relatively informal working conditions of the early and mid-nineteenth century. As the corporate form of organization spread, employers set out to make the factory more efficient
(often in response to the principles of scientific management). That meant, they believed, centralizing control of the workplace in the hands of managers, ensuring that workers had no authority or control that might disrupt the flow of production. This loss of control, as much as the low wages and long hours, lay behind the substantial working-class militancy in the late nineteenth century.
Women and Children at Work
The decreasing need for skilled work in factories induced many employers to increase the use of unskilled women and
children, whom they could hire for lower wages than adult males. By 1900, women made up 17 percent of the industrial workforce, a fourfold increase since 1870; and 20 percent of all women (well over 5 million) were wage earners. Some of these working women were single and took jobs to support themselves or their parents or siblings. Many others were married and had to work to supplement the inadequate earnings of their husbands; for many working-class families, two incomes were required to support even a minimal standard of living. Many reformers, including many females, saw women as particularly vulnerable to exploitation and injury in the rough environment of the factory. They considered it inappropriate for women to work independently. The "problem” of women in the workforce became a significant public issue. In some communities the aversion to seeing married women work was so strong-among both men and women-that families struggled on inadequate wages rather than see a wife and mother take a job.
Women industrial workers were overwhelmingly white and mostly young, 75 percent of them under twenty-five. The vast Poorly Paid majority were immigrants or the daughters Women of immigrants. There were some women in all areas of industry, even in some of the most arduous jobs. Most women, however, worked in a few industries where unskilled and semiskilled machine labor (as opposed to heavy manual labor) prevailed. The textile industry remained the largest single industrial employer of women. (Domestic service remained the most common female occupation overall.) Women worked for wages as low as $6 to $8 a week, well below the minimum necessary for survival (and well below the wages paid to men working the same jobs). At the turn of the century, the average annual wage for a male
478 » CHAPTER 17
i
SPINDLE BOYS
Young boys, some of them barefoot, clamber among the great textile machines in a Georgia cotton mill adjusting spindles. Many of them were the children of women who worked in the plants. The photograph is by Lewis Hine. E© Lewis Hine/ Corbis) industrial worker was $597; for a woman, it was $314. Even highly skilled women workers made about half what men doing the same job earned. Advocates of a minimum-wage law for women created a sensation when several women testified at a hearing in Chicago that low wages and desperate poverty had driven them to prostitution. (The testimony was not, however, sensational enough for the Illinois legislature, which promptly defeated the bill.)
At least 1.7 million children under sixteen years of age were employed in factories and fields in 1900, more than twice the number of thirty years before. Ten percent of all girls aged ten to fifteen, and 20 percent of all boys, held jobs. This was partly because some families so desperately needed additional wages that parents and children alike were pressed into service. It was also because in some families the reluctance to permit wives to work led parents to send their children into the workforce to avoid forcing mothers to go. This did not, however, prevent reformers from seeing children working in factories as a significant social problem. Under the pressure of outraged public opinion, thirty-eight state legislatures passed child-labor laws in the late
nineteenth century; but these laws were of limited impact. Sixty percent of child workers were employed in agriculture, which was typically exempt from the laws; such children often worked twelve-hour days picking or hoeing in the fields. And even for children employed in factories, the laws merely set a minimum age of twelve years and a maximum workday of ten hours, standards that employers often ignored. In the cotton mills of the South, children working at the looms all night were kept awake by having cold water thrown in their faces. In canneries, little girls cut fruits and vegetables sixteen
Ineffective
Child-Labor
Laws
hours a day. Exhausted children were particularly susceptible to injury while working at dangerous machines, and they were maimed and even killed in industrial accidents at an alarming rate.
As much as the appalling conditions of women and child workers troubled the national conscience, conditions for many men were at least equally dangerous. In mills and mines, and on the railroads, the American accident rate was higher than that of any industrial nation in the world. As late as 1907, an average of twelve railroad men a week died on the job. In factories, thousands of workers faced such occupational diseases as lead or phosphorus poisoning, against which few employers took precautions.
The Struggle to Unionize
Labor leaders attempted to fight back against the poor conditions in the workplace by adopting some of the same tactics their employers had used so effectively: creating large combinations, or unions. But by the end of the century their efforts had met with little success.
There had been craft unions in America, representing small groups of skilled workers, since well before the Civil War. Alone, however, individual unions could not hope to exert
National significant power in the new corporate Labor Union economy, and in the 1860s some labor leaders began to search for ways to combine the energies of the various labor organizations. The first attempt to federate separate unions into a single national organization came in 1866, when William H. Sylvis founded the National Labor Union-a polyglot association, claiming 640,000 members, that included a variety of reform groups having lirie
J
INDUSTRIAL SUPREMACY
• 479 I____________
KEHOE HANGED.
Last Scenes in the Life of the King of the Molly Maguires.
I AM NOT GUILTY.
History of Kehoe’s Prominent Share in the Many
Murders in the Gcal Reaion.
0
EVIDENCE FROM SPIES.
workers agreed that "man should be the breadwinner/ as one female union organizer said. But many argued that as long as conditions made it impossible for men to support their families, women should have full and equal opportunities in the workplace.
Unions faced special difficulties during the recession years of the 1870s. Not only was there widespread unemployment; there was also widespread middle-class hostility toward the unions. When labor disputes with employers turned bitter Molly	and vio^ent> as they occasionally did, much
Maguires of the public instinctively blamed the workers (or the "radicals” and "anarchists” they believed were influencing the workers) for the trouble, rarely the employers. Particularly alarming to middle-class Americans was the emergence of the "Molly Maguires,” a militant labor organization in the anthracite coal region of Pennsylvania. The Mollies operated within the Ancient Order of Hibernians, an Irish fraternal society. They attempted to intimidate the coal operators through violence and occasionally murder, and they added to the growing perception that labor activism was motivated by dangerous radicals. Much of the violence attributed to the Molly Maguires, however, was instigated or performed by informers and agents employed by the mine owners, who wanted a pretext for ruthless measures to
suppress unionization.
Little Excitement in Pottsville on the Occasion of the Execution,
[by telegraph to the herald.]
Pottsville, Pa., Dec. 18, 1878,
The people of Pottsville have become so accustomed
to executions of Molly Maguires that there Is no excitement attendant upon this occasion. Jack Kehoe, the terror of the coal fields, the braggart and desperado, passed a most miserable night, The guards say that he only got a few moments’ sleep. He
/I	,	_j	...	-
MOLLY MCGUIRES
The Molly Maguires were known for their harsh, intimidating, and at times violent tactics against the owners and managers of anthracite coal mines. This newspaper notice announces the execution of Jack Kehoe—both high constable of Mahanoy County in Pennsylvania and a member of the Molly McGuires—who was found guilty of multiple murders in this coal-producing region. He was posthumously pardoned of these crimes in 1979 suggesting that his cry "I am not guilty" was indeed true. (© American Antiquarian Society, Worcester, Massachusetts, USA/The Bridgeman Art Library) direct relationship with labor. After the Panic of 1873, the National Labor Union disintegrated and disappeared.
The National Labor Union, like most of the individual unions that joined it, excluded women workers. Male workers argued (not entirely incorrectly) that women were used to drive down their wages; and they justified their hostility by invoking the ideal of domesticity. "Woman was created to be man’s companion,” a National Labor Union official said, "to be the presiding deity of the home circle.” Most women
The Great Railroad Strike
Excitement over the Molly Maguires paled beside the near hysteria that gripped the country during the railroad strike of 1877, which began when the eastern railroads announced a 10 percent wage cut and which soon expanded into something approaching a class war. Strikers disrupted rail service
National	fr°m Baltimore to St. Louis, destroyed
Strike	equipment, and rioted in the streets of
Pittsburgh and other cities. State militias were called out, and in July President Hayes ordered federal troops to suppress the disorders in West Virginia. In Baltimore, eleven demonstrators died and forty were wounded in a conflict between workers and militiamen. In Philadelphia, state militia opened fire on thousands of workers and their families who were attempting to block the railroad crossings and killed twenty people. In all, more than 100 people died before the strike finally collapsed several weeks after it had begun.
The great railroad strike was America’s first major, national labor conflict, and it illustrated how disputes between workers and employers could no longer be localized in the increasingly national economy. It illustrated as well the depth of resentment among many American workers toward their employers (and toward the governments allied with them) and the lengths to which they were prepared to go to express that resentment. And finally, it was an indication of the frailty of the labor movement. The failure of the strike seriously weakened the railroad unions and damaged the reputation of labor organizations in other industries as well.
480 • CHAPTER 17
The Knights of Labor
The first genuinely national labor organization was the Noble Order of the Knights of Labor, founded in 1869 under the leadership of Uriah S. Stephens. Membership was open to all who "toiled,” a definition that included all workers and most business and professional people. The only excluded groups were lawyers, bankers, liquor dealers, and professional gamblers. Unlike most labor organizations of the time, the Knights welcomed women members-not just female factory workers, but domestic servants and women who worked in their own homes. Leonora Barry, an Irish immigrant who had worked in a New York hosiery factory, ran the Woman’s Bureau of the Knights. Under her effective leadership, the Knights enlisted 50,000 women members (both black and white) and created over a hundred all-female locals.
The Knights were loosely organized, without much central direction. Members met in local "assemblies,” which took many different forms. They were loosely affiliated with a national "general assembly.” Their program was similarly vague. Although they championed an eight-hour day and the abolition of child labor, the leaders were more interested in long-range reform of the economy. Leaders of the Knights hoped to replace the "wage system” with a new "cooperative system,” in which workers would themselves control a large part of the economy.
For several years, the Knights remained a secret fraternal organization. But in the late 1870s, under the leadership of Terence V. Powderly, the order moved into the open and entered a spectacular period of expansion. By 1886, it claimed a total membership of over 700,000, including some militant elements that the moderate
Dissolution of THE Knights of Labor
leadership could not always control. Local unions or assemblies associated with the Knights launched a series of strikes in the 1880s in defiance of Powderly’s wishes. In 1885, striking railway workers forced the Missouri Pacific, a link in the Gould system, to restore wage cuts and recognize their union. But the victory was temporary. In the following year, a strike on another Gould railroad, the Texas and Pacific, was crushed, and the power of the unions in the Gould system was broken. Their failure helped discredit the organization. By 1890, the membership of the Knights had shrunk to 100,000. A few years later, the organization disappeared.
The AFL
Even before the Knights began to decline, a rival organization based on a very different organizational concept appeared. In 1881, representatives of a number of existing craft unions formed the Federation of Organized Trade and Labor Unions of the United States and Canada. Five years later, it changed its name to the American Federation of Labor (AFL), and it soon became the most important and enduring labor group in the country. Rejecting the Knights’ idea of one big union for everybody, the Federation was an association of autonomous craft unions and represented mainly skilled workers. It was generally hostile to organizing unskilled workers, who did not fit comfortably within the craft-based structure of existing organizations.
Toward women, the AFL adopted an apparently contradictory policy. On the one hand, the male leaders of the AFL were hostile to the idea of women entering the
Opposition paid workforce. Because women were weak, to Female tjie believed, employers could easily take advantage of them by paying them less than
KNIGHTS OF LABOR DELEGATES, 1886
The Knights of Labor was the first, and for many years the only, labor organization to welcome women unreservedly, as this portrait of delegates to the Knights 1886 convention indicates. (The Library of Congress (LC-USZ62-12485)) INDUSTRIAL SUPREMACY * 481
men. As a result, women workers drove down wages for everyone. "It is the so-called competition of the unorganized, defenseless woman worker, the girl and the wife, that often tends to reduce the wages of the father and husband," Samuel Gompers, the powerful leader of the AFL, once said. He talked often about the importance of women remaining in the home and argued (incorrectly) that "there is no necessity of the wife contributing to the support of the family by working." More than that, female labor was, the AFL newspaper wrote, "the knife of the assassin, aimed at the family circle." Gompers himself believed strongly that a test of a man’s worth was his ability to support a family and that women in the workforce would undermine men’s positions as heads of their families.
Although hostile to the idea of women workers, the AFL nevertheless sought equal pay for those women who did work and even hired some female organizers to encourage unionization in industries dominated by women. These positions were, in fact, less contradictory than they seem. By raising the pay of women, the AFL could make them less attractive to employers and, in effect, drive them out of the workforce.
Gompers accepted the basic premises of capitalism; his goal was simply to secure for workers a greater share of capitalism’s material rewards. Gompers opposed the creation of a worker’s party; he was generally hostile to any government efforts to
The AFL’s protect labor or improve working condi-
Agenda tions, convinced that what government could give it could also take away. The AFL concentrated instead on the relationship between labor and management. It supported the immediate objectives of most workers: better wages and working conditions. And while the AFL hoped to attain its goals by collective bargaining, it was
ready to use strikes if necessary.
As one of its first objectives, the AFL demanded a national eight-hour day and called for a general strike if workers did not achieve the goal by May 1, 1886. On that day, strikes and demonstrations calling for a shorter workday took place all over the country, most of them staged by AFL unions but a few by radical groups.
In Chicago, a center of labor and radical strength, a strike was
Haymarket already in progress at the McCormick
Square Harvester Company when the general strike began. City police had been harassing the strikers, and labor and radical leaders called a protest meeting at Haymarket Square. When the police ordered the crowd to disperse, someone threw a bomb that killed seven officers and injured sixty-seven other people. The police, who had killed four strikers the day before, fired into the crowd and killed four more people. Conservative, property-conscious Americans, frightened and outraged, demanded retribution, even though no one knew who had thrown the bomb. Chicago officials finally rounded up eight anarchists and charged them with murder, on the grounds that their statements had incited whoever had hurled the bomb. All eight scapegoats were found guilty after a remarkably injudicious trial. Seven were sentenced to death. One of the condemned committed suicide, four were executed,
md two had their sentences commuted to life imprisonment.
To most middle-class Americans, the Haymarket bombing was an alarming symbol of social chaos and radicalism. "Anarchism” now became a code word in the public mind for terrorism and violence, even though most anarchists were relatively peaceful visionaries dreaming of a new social order. For the next thirty years, the specter of anarchism remained one of the most frightening concepts in the American middle-class imagination. It also became a constant obstacle to the goals of the AFL and other labor organizations, and it was particularly devastating to the Knights of Labor, which, as the most radical of the major labor organizations, never recovered from the post-Haymarket hysteria. However much they tried to distance themselves from radicals, unions were always vulnerable to accusations of anarchism, as the violent strikes of the 1890s occasionally illustrated.
The Homestead Strike
The Amalgamated Association of Iron and Steel Workers, which was affiliated with the American Federation of Labor, was the most powerful trade union in the country. Its members were skilled workers, in great demand by employers and thus able to exercise significant power in the workplace. Employers sometimes called such workers "little shopfloor autocrats," and they resented the substantial control over working conditions these skilled laborers often had. The union had a rulebook with fifty-six pages of what workers called "legislation" limiting the power of employers. In the emerging corporate world of the late nineteenth century, such challenges to management control were beginning to seem intolerable to many employers.
By the mid-1880s, the steel industry had introduced new production methods and new patterns of organization that were streamlining the steelmaking process and, at the same time, reducing the companies’ dependence on skilled labor. In the Carnegie system, the union had a foothold in only one of the corporation’s three major factories-the Homestead plant Henry Clay	near Pittsburgh. By 1890, Carnegie and his
Frick	chief lieutenant, Henry Clay Frick, had de-
cided that the Amalgamated "had to go," even at Homestead. Over the next two years, they repeatedly cut wages at Homestead. At first, the union acquiesced, aware
that it was not strong enough to wage a successful strike.
In 1892, the company stopped even discussing its decisions with the Amalgamated, in effect denying the union’s right to negotiate. Finally, when Frick announced another wage cut at Homestead and gave the union two days to accept it, the Amalgamated called for a strike. Frick abruptly shut down the plant and called in 300 guards from the Pinkerton Detective Agency to enable the company to hire nonunion workers. The hated Pinkertons were well-known strikebreakers, and their mere presence was often enough to incite workers to violence.
The Pinkertons approached the plant by river on barges on July 6, 1892. The strikers prepared for them by pouring oil on the water and setting it on fire, and they met the guards at the docks with guns and dynamite. After several hours of pitched
482 * CHAPTER 17
battle, during which three guards and ten strikers were killed
and many others injured, the Pinkertons surrendered and were
escorted roughly out of town.
But the workers’ victory was temporary. The governor of Pennsylvania, at the company’s request, sent the state’s entire The Union National Guard contingent, some 8,000
Defeated troops, to Homestead. Production resumed, with strikebreakers now protected by troops. Public opinion turned against the strikers when a radical made an attempt to assassinate Frick. Slowly, workers drifted back to their jobs; and finally-four months after the strike began-the Amalgamated surrendered. By 1900, every major steel plant in the Northeast had broken with the Amalgamated, which now had no power to resist. Its membership shrank from a high of 24,000 in 1891 (two-thirds of all eligible steelworkers) to fewer than 7,000 a decade later. Its decline was symbolic of the general erosion of union strength in the late nineteenth century, as factory labor became increasingly unskilled and workers thus became easier to replace. The AFL unions were often powerless in the face of these changes.
The Pullman Strike
A dispute of greater magnitude and equal bitterness, if less violence, was the Pullman strike in 1894. The Pullman Palace Car Company manufactured sleeping and parlor cars for railroads, which it built and repaired at a plant near Chicago. The company built a 600-acre town, named Pullman, and rented its trim, orderly houses to the employees. George M. Pullman, owner of the company, considered the town a model solution to the industrial problem; he referred to the workers as his "children.” But many residents chafed at the regimentation and the high rents.
In the winter of 1893-1894, the Pullman Company slashed wages by about 25 percent, citing the declining revenues the depression that began in 1983 was causing. At the same time, Pullman refused to reduce rents in its model town, which were 20 to 25 percent higher than rents for comparable accommodations in surrounding areas. Workers went on strike Eugene Debs and persuaded the militant American Railway Union, led by Eugene V. Debs, to support them by refusing to handle Pullman cars and equipment. Opposing the strikers was the General Managers’ Association, a consortium of twenty-four Chicago railroads. It persuaded its member companies to discharge switchmen who refused to handle Pullman cars. Every time this happened, Debs’s union instructed its members who worked for the offending companies to walk off their jobs. Within a few days thousands of railroad workers in twenty-seven states and territories were on strike, and transportation from Chicago to the
Pacific coast was paralyzed.
Most state governors responded readily to appeals from
strike-threatened businesses; but the governor of Illinois, John
Peter Altgeld, was a man with demonstrated sympathies for
workers and their grievances. Altgeld had criticized the trials
of the Haymarket anarchists and had pardoned the convicted
THE PULLMAN STRIKE
These two images portray two aspects of the great Pullman strike of 1894. The photograph above shows U.S. troops, ordered to Chicago to quell the strike, camping on the lakefront. The drawing below shows freight cars and an engine destroyed by striking workers. These images were published together in Harper's Weekly to illustrate the ferocity of the Pullman battle. (The Library of Congress (LC-USZ62-96506)) men who were still in prison when he took office. He refused to call out the militia to protect employers now. Bypassing Altgeld, railroad operators asked the federal government to send regular army troops to Illinois, on the pretext that the strike was preventing the movement of mail on the trains. President Grover Cleveland and Attorney General Richard Olney, a former railroad lawyer and a bitter foe of unions, complied. In July 1894, over Altgeld’s objections, the president ordered 2,000 troops to the Chicago area. A federal court issued an injunction forbidding the union to continue the strike.
INDUSTRIAL SUPREMACY
• 483 When Debs and his associates defied it, they were arrested and imprisoned. With federal troops protecting the hiring of new workers and with the union leaders in a federal jail, the strike quickly collapsed.
Sources of Labor Weakness
The last decades of the nineteenth century were years in which labor, despite its organizing efforts, made few real gains and suffered many important losses. In a rapidly expanding industrial economy, wages for workers rose hardly at all, and not nearly enough to keep up with the rising cost of living. Labor leaders won a few legislative victories: the abolition by Congress in 1885 of the Contract Labor Law; the establishment by Congress in 1868 of an eight-hour day on public works projects and in 1892 of an eight-hour day for government employees; state laws governing hours of labor and safety standards; and gradually some guaranteed compensation for workers injured on the job. But many of these laws were not enforced, and neither strikes nor protests seemed to have much effect. The end of the century found most workers with less political power and considerably less control of the workplace than they had had forty years before.
Workers failed to make greater gains for many reasons. The principal labor organizations represented only a small percentage of the industrial workforce. Four percent of all workers (fewer than 1 million) belonged to unions in 1900. The AFL, the most important, excluded unskilled workers, who were emerging as the core of the industrial workforce, and along with them most women, blacks, and recent immigrants. Women responded to this exclusion in 1903 by forming their own organization, the Women’s Trade Union League (WTUL). But after several frustrating years of attempting to unionize women, the WTUL turned the bulk of its attention to securing protective legislation for women workers, not general organization and mobilization of labor. Other divisions within the workforce contributed further to union weakness. Tensions between different ethnic and racial groups kept laborers divided.
Another source of labor weakness was the shifting nature of the workforce. Many immigrant workers came to America
intending to remain only briefly, to earn some money and return home. The assumption that they had no long-range fu-
Shifting ture in the country (even though it was Nature of the often a mistaken one) eroded their willing-Workforce ness to organize. Other workers-natives and immigrants alike-were in constant motion, moving from one job to another, one town to another, seldom in one place long enough to establish institutional ties or exert real power. A study of Newburyport, Massachusetts, over a thirty-year period shows that 90 percent of the workers there vanished from the town records in those years, many of them because they moved elsewhere. Even workers who stayed put often did not remain in the same job
for long.
Some real social mobility did exist. Workers might move from unskilled to semiskilled or skilled jobs during their lifetimes; their children might become foremen or managers. The gains were small, but they were enough to inspire considerable (and often unrealistic) hopes and to persuade some workers that they were not part of a permanent working class.
Above all, workers made few gains in the late nineteenth century because of the strength of the forces arrayed against Corporate them. They faced corporate organizations
Strength °f vast wealth and power, which were generally determined to crush any efforts by workers to challenge their prerogatives-not just through brute force, but also through infiltration of unions, espionage within working-class communities, and sabotage of organizational efforts. And as the Homestead and Pullman strikes suggest, the corporations usually had the support of local, state, and federal authorities, who were willing to send in troops to "preserve order” and crush labor uprisings
on demand.
Despite the creation of new labor unions, despite a wave of strikes and protests that in the 1880s and 1890s reached startling proportions, workers in the late nineteenth century failed to create successful organizations or to protect their interests in the way the large corporations managed to do. In the battle for power within the emerging industrial economy, almost all the advantages seemed to lie with capital.
looking back
In the four decades following the end of the Civil War, the United States propelled itself into the forefront of the industrializing nations of the world. Large areas of the nation remained overwhelmingly rural, to be sure, and the majority of the population was still engaged in activities closely tied to farming. Even so, America’s economy, and along with it the nation’s society and culture, were being profoundly transformed.
New technologies, new forms of corporate management,
and new supplies of labor helped make possible the rapid
growth of the nation’s industries and the construction of its
railroads. The factory system contributed to the growth of the
nation’s cities and at times created entirely new ones. Immigration provided a steady supply of new workers for the growing industrial economy. The result was a steady and substantial increase in national wealth, rising living standards for much of the population, and the creation of great new fortunes.
But industrialization did not spread its fruits evenly. Large areas of the country, most notably the South, profited relatively little from economic growth as did large groups in the population, most notably minorities, women, and recent immigrants. Industrial workers experienced arduous labor conditions and wages that rose much more slowly than the profits
Key Terms/People/Places/Events
RECALL AND REFLECT
of the corporations for which they worked. Small merchants and manufacturers found themselves overmatched by great new combinations.
Industrialists strove to create a rationale for their power and to persuade the public that everyone had something to gain from it. But many Americans remained skeptical of modern capitalism, and some-workers struggling to form unions,
American Federation of Labor 480
Andrew Carnegie 464
Edward Bellamy 473
Eugene V. Debs 482
Frederick Winslow Taylor 462
Gospel of wealth 471
Haymarket bombing 481
Henry Clay Frick 481
Henry Ford 461
Henry George 472 Homestead strike 481 Horatio Alger 472 Horizontal integration 466 John D. Rockefeller 466 John Peter Altgeld 482 J. P. Morgan 464 Knights of Labor 480 Molly Maguires 479
1.	Who were some of the business and industrial titans of the late nineteenth century, and what did they contribute to America’s industrial growth?
2.	What changes took place in corporate organization in the late nineteenth century, and how did these changes affect the nation’s economy?
reformers denouncing trusts, women fighting to win protections for female laborers, socialists envisioning a new world, and many others-created broad and powerful critiques of the new economic order. Industrialization brought both progress and pain to late-nineteenth-century America. Controversies over its effects defined the era and would continue to define the first decades of the twentieth century.
National Labor Union 478 Pullman strike 482 Samuel Gompers 481 Scientific management 462 Social Darwinism 471 Vertical integration 466 Wilbur and Orville Wright 462 Women’s Trade Union League 483
3.	What was the Social Gospel?
4.	How did Social Darwinism attempt to justify the social consequences of industrial capitalism?
5.	How did workers respond to the expansion of industrialization and the new industrial economy?
INDUSTRIAL SUPREMACY . 485
SIGNIFICANT EVENTS
1859					1886
First oil well drilled in Pennsylvania	•	1866	1888	9	Haymarket bombing blamed on anarchists
		William H. Sylvis founds National Labor Union	Edward Bellamy publishes Looking Backward	•	
1869	•	First transatlantic cable laid		•	1892
Knights of Labor founded					Workers strike Homestead
					plant
	•	1870	1893	•	
		John D. Rockefeller founds Standard Oil	Depression begins		
1873	. •				1894
Carnegie Steel founded				•	Workers strike Pullman
Commercial and financial panic					Company
disrupts economy	•	1876	1901	A	j ;
		Alexander Graham Bell invents	J. P. Morgan creates United		
		telephone	States Steel Corporation		
1877	•		Spindletop oil field discovered in Texas	A -	1903
Railroad workers strike					Wright brothers make first
nationwide					successful flight at Kitty Hawk,
A
North Carolina 		Thomas A. Edison invents electric lightbulb	Henry Ford produces his first automobiles	• w	i ;
1881
American Federation of Labor founded
■!	r
!	I
THE AGE OF THE CITY
SNOW IN NEW YORK, 1902
Robert Henri Cozad (1865-1929) was one of a number of painters who, in the early twentieth century, created what became known as the "Ashcan” school of painting. These artists painted scenes of the urban underworld—tenements, saloons, boxing rings. (Courtesy National Gallery of Art, Washington! I
1
LOOKING AHEAD
1.	What were some of the problems that resulted from rapid urbanization, and how did urban governments respond to these problems?
2.	How did the sources of immigration to America shift in the late nineteenth century, and what was the native response to the change?
How did the rise of mass consumption affect leisure and entertainment?
SETTING THE STAGE
THE INDUSTRIALIZATION AND COMMERCIALIZATION
of America changed the face of society in countless ways. Nowhere were those changes more profound than in the growth of cities and the creation of an urban society and culture. Having begun its life as a primarily agrarian republic, the United States in the late nineteenth century was becoming an urban nation. The change did not come easily. Cities grew so rapidly that their facilities and institutions could not keep pace. Housing, transportation, sewers, social services, governments—al, lagged far behind the enormous demands the new urban population was placing on them. The enormous diversity of many urban populations required cities to assimilate different and sometimes clashing population groups—a challenge that has continued to face the nation into the present.
But despite their many problems, cities continued to grow in both size and influence. People flocked to them to take advantage of the economic and educational opportunities they offered, to escape what many considered the boredom of rural life, and to experience the new forms of entertainment that cities were helping to advance.
As centers of wealth, cities also became the sites of great civic projects that have defined the identity of many urban centers ever since. Cities across the United States, and around much of the world, set out in these years to build public parks, museums, theaters, opera houses, monumental railroad stations, imposing libraries, and great boulevards.
The city of a century ago, like the city of today, symbolized many of the greatest achievements and desires of modern society and also many of its greatest fears.
THE URBANIZATION OF AMERICA
The great migration from the countryside to the city was not unique to the United States. It was occurring simultaneously throughout much of the Western world in response to industrialization and the factory system. America, a society with little experience of great cities, found urbanization both jarring and alluring.
Rapid Urban Growth
The Lure of the City
"We cannot all live in cities,” the journalist Horace Greeley wrote shortly after the Civil War, "yet nearly all seem determined to do so.” The urban population of America increased sevenfold in the half century after the Civil War. And in 1920, the census revealed that for the first time, a majority of the American people lived in "urban” areas-communities of 2,500 people or more. New York City and its environs grew
from 1 million in 1860 to over 3 million in 1900. Chicago had 100,000 residents in 1860 and more than a million in 1900. Cities were experiencing similar growth in all areas of the country.
Natural increase accounted for only a small part of the urban growth. In fact, urban families experienced a high rate of infant mortality, a declining fertility rate, and a high death rate from disease. Without immigration, cities would have grown slowly, if at all. The city attracted people from the countryside because it offered conveniences, entertainments, and cultural experiences unavailable in rural communities. Cities gave women the opportunity to act in ways that in smaller communities would have been seen to violate "propriety.” They gave gay men and lesbian women space in which to build a culture (even if still a mostly hidden one) and experiment sex ually at least partly insulated from the hostile gaze of others. But most of all, cities attracted people because they offered more and better-paying jobs than were available in rural America or in the
foreign economies many immigrants were fleeing.
People moved to cities, too, because new forms of transportation made it easier for them to get
there. Railroads made simple, quick, and inexpensive what once was a daunting journey from parts
487
488
